Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1079
Licensed cosmetology establishment; nail technology services.

A licensed cosmetology establishment is not required to be licensed as a nail technology salon to provide nail technology services by either a licensed cosmetologist or by a licensed nail technologist.

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,119.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 341.